Montana, session 2025, SB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 39-71-742, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-71-742. Who may receive payment. (1) A payment due to a child under 18 years of age or to a
person adjudged incompetent must be made to the parent, or the appointed guardian, or the benefits custodian,
and the written receipt for the payment must acquit the employer, the insurer, or the department of further
liability.
(2) A payment due to a member of the highway patrol receiving the salary benefit provided in 44-1-
511 must be made to the department of justice to offset the salary benefit until the member is no longer eligible
to receive the salary benefit.
(3) In other cases, payment must be made to the person entitled to the payment or to the person's
authorized representative.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (1), the term "benefits custodian" means a person appointed by
the workers' compensation judge as provided in 39-71-2905 to pursue benefits or receive payments on behalf
of a child under 18 years of age or to a person adjudged incompetent."

Section 2. Section 39-71-2905, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-71-2905. Petition to workers' compensation judge -- time limit on filing. (1) If a claimant, an
insurer, an employer alleged to be an uninsured employer, or the uninsured employers' fund has a dispute
concerning any benefits under this chapter, it may petition the workers' compensation judge for a determination
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 202

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 202.1
of the dispute after satisfying dispute resolution requirements otherwise provided in this chapter. In addition, the
district court that has jurisdiction over a pending action under 39-71-515 may request the workers'
compensation judge to determine the amount of recoverable damages due to the employee. The judge, after a
hearing, shall make a determination of the dispute in accordance with the law as set forth in this chapter. If the
dispute relates to benefits due to a claimant under this chapter, the judge shall fix and determine any benefits to
be paid and specify the manner of payment. After parties have satisfied dispute resolution requirements
provided elsewhere in this chapter, the workers' compensation judge has exclusive jurisdiction to make
determinations concerning disputes under this chapter, except as provided in 39-71-317 and 39-71-516. The
penalties and assessments allowed against an insurer under this chapter are the exclusive penalties and
assessments that can be assessed by the workers' compensation judge against an insurer for disputes arising
under this chapter.
(2) A petition for a hearing before the workers' compensation judge must be filed within 2 years
after benefits are denied.
(3) A claimant, an insurer, or the uninsured employers' fund may petition the workers'
compensation judge for the appointment of a benefits custodian. A party is not required to satisfy the dispute
resolution requirements provided in this chapter prior to petitioning for a benefits custodian. The workers'
compensation judge has jurisdiction to appoint and terminate appointment of a benefits custodian."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 202